fi: Tarran materiaalityyppi: Epoksi-/hartsipäällysteinen; Kangas; Folio; Voimapaperi; PET (polyesteri); Paperi; Vinyyli (PVC); Washi-paperi; Muu
pt-BR: Adesivo tipo de material: Resinado (epóxi/resina); Tecido; Foil; Papel kraft; PET (poliéster); Papel; Vinil (PVC); Papel washi; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta materiala nalepke: Epoksi/smola (izbočeno); Tkanina; Folija; Kraft papir; PET (poliester); Papir; Vinil (PVC); Washi papir; Drugo
cs: Typ materiálu samolepky: S vypouklou vrstvou z epoxidu/pryskyřice; Látka; Fólie; Kraftový papír; PET (polyester); Papír; Vinyl (PVC); Papír washi; Jiný
ro-RO: Tipul de material al autocolantului: Cu dom din epoxi/rășină; Material textil; Folie; Hârtie kraft; PET (poliester); Hârtie; Vinil (PVC); Hârtie washi; Altele
nb: Materialetype for klistremerke: Epoksy / harpiks (kuppelformet); Stoff; Folie; Kraftpapir; PET (polyester); Papir; Vinyl (PVC); Washipapir; Annet
nl: Sticker materiaaltype: Met epoxy/harslaag; Stof; Folie; Kraftpapier; PET (polyester); Papier; Vinyl (PVC); Washipapier; Overig
de: Materialart des Aufklebers: Epoxid/Kunstharz-Doming; Stoff; Folie; Kraftpapier; PET (Polyester); Papier; Vinyl (PVC); Washi-Papier; Andere
es: Tipo de material adhesivo: Con cúpula de epoxi/resina; Tela; Laminado metálico; Papel kraft; PET (poliéster); Papel; Vinilo (PVC); Papel washi; Otro
tr: Etiket malzemesi türü: Epoksi/reçine damlalı; Kumaş; Folyo; Kraft kağıt; PET (polyester); Kağıt; Vinil (PVC); Washi kağıdı; Diğer
vi: Loại vật liệu nhãn dán: Phủ keo epoxy/resin; Vải; Giấy bạc; Giấy kraft; PET (polyester); Giấy; Vinyl (PVC); Giấy washi; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de material dos autocolantes: Cúpula de resina/epóxi; Tecido; Folha metálica; Papel kraft; PET (poliéster); Papel; Vinil (PVC); Papel washi; Outro
fr: Type de matériau du support de l’autocollant: Dôme en époxy/résine; Tissu; Aluminium; Papier kraft; PET (polyester); Papier; Vinyle (PVC); Papier washi; Autre
da: Materialetype for sticker: Epoxy/resin med kuppel; Stof; Folie; Kraftpapir; PET (polyester); Papir; Vinyl (PVC); Washipapir; Andet
bg-BG: Тип материал на стикера: С епоксидна смола/обемни; Текстил; Фолио; Крафт хартия; PET (полиестер); Хартия; Винил (PVC); Уаши хартия; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta materijala naljepnice: Kupola od epoksija/smole; Tkanina; Folija; Kraft papir; PET (poliester); Papir; Vinil (PVC); Washi papir; Ostalo
it: Tipo di materiale dell'adesivo: A cupola in epossidica/resina; Tessuto; Lamina; Carta kraft; PET (poliestere); Carta; Vinile (PVC); Carta washi; Altro
ru: Тип материала наклеек: С эпоксидной смолой (объемные); Ткань; Фольга; Крафт-бумага; ПЭТ (полиэстер); Бумага; Винил (ПВХ); Бумага васи (washi); Другое
lt-LT: Lipdukų medžiagos tipas: Iškili epoksidinė derva / derva; Audinys; Folija; „Kraft“ popierius; PET (poliesteris); Popierius; Vinilas (PVC); „Washi“ popierius; Kita
pl: Rodzaj materiału naklejki: Wypukłe z żywicy/epoksydu; Tkanina; Folia; Papier pakowy (kraft); PET (poliester); Papier; Winyl (PVC); Papier washi; Inne
zh-TW: 貼紙材質類型: 環氧樹脂/滴膠; 布料; 鋁箔; 牛皮紙; PET (聚酯); 紙; 乙烯基 (PVC); 和紙; 其他
sv: Materialtyp för klistermärken: Epoxi-/hartsdoming; Tyg; Folie; Kraftpapper; PET (polyester); Papper; Vinyl (PVC); Washipapper; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ materiálu nálepky: Epoxidové/živicové s 3D efektom; Látka; Fólia; Sulfátový papier; PET (polyester); Papier; Vinyl (PVC); Papier washi; Iné
hu: Matrica anyagának típusa: Epoxi/gyanta bevonatú (domború); Szövet; Fólia; Kraft papír; PET (poliészter); Papír; Vinil (PVC); Washi papír; Egyéb
en: Sticker material type: Epoxy/resin domed; Fabric; Foil; Kraft paper; PET (polyester); Paper; Vinyl (PVC); Washi paper; Other
th: ประเภทวัสดุของสติกเกอร์: อีพ็อกซี/เรซินนูน; ผ้า; ฟอยล์; กระดาษคราฟท์; PET (โพลีเอสเตอร์); กระดาษ; ไวนิล (PVC); กระดาษวาชิ; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 贴纸材质类型: 滴胶/树脂圆顶; 织物; 箔; 牛皮纸; PET (聚酯); 纸; 乙烯基 (PVC); 和纸; 其他
ja: ステッカー素材タイプ: エポキシ/樹脂ドーム; ファブリック; ホイル; クラフト紙; PET (ポリエステル); 紙; ビニール (PVC); 和紙; その他
el: Τύπος υλικού αυτοκόλλητων: Με επικάλυψη εποξικής ρητίνης (Domed); Ύφασμα; Μεταλλικό φύλλο (Foil); Χαρτί κραφτ; PET (πολυεστέρας); Χαρτί; Βινύλιο (PVC); Χαρτί washi; Άλλο
ko: 스티커 재질 종류: 에폭시/레진 돔; 패브릭; 포일; 크라프트지; PET(폴리에스테르); 종이; 비닐(PVC); 와시 페이퍼; 기타